Nebraska, session 109, LB418.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB418 LB418
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-1424, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
38-1424 (1) In addition to the grounds for disciplinary action found
in sections 38-178 and 38-179, a credential issued under the Funeral
Directing and Embalming Practice Act may be denied, refused renewal,
limited, revoked, or suspended or have other disciplinary measures taken
against it in accordance with section 38-196 when the applicant or
credential holder is found guilty of any of the following acts or
offenses:
(a) Solicitation of dead human bodies by the credential holder or
his or her agents, assistants, or employees, either prior to or following
death;
(b) The purchasing of funeral or embalming engagements or the
payment of a commission either directly or indirectly or offer of payment
of such commission to any agent, assistant, or employee for the purpose
of securing business;
(c) Using indecent, profane, or obscene language in the presence of
a dead human body or within the immediate presence or hearing of the
family, relatives, or friends of the deceased prior to the burial of the
deceased;
(d) Soliciting or accepting any remuneration, commission, bonus, or
rebate in consideration of the recommending or causing a dead human body
to be placed in any crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery;
(e) Using any casket or part thereof which has previously been used
as a receptacle for, or in connection with, the shipment, burial, or
other disposition of a dead human body without first identifying such
item as used;
(f) Violations of any state law, municipal ordinance, or rule or
regulation of the department or other body having regulatory powers,
relating to the handling, custody, care, or transportation of dead human
bodies;
-2-

LB418 LB418
2025 2025
(g) Refusal to surrender promptly the custody of a dead human body
upon request of a person or persons lawfully entitled to the custody
thereof; or
(h) Taking undue advantage of a patron or patrons, or being found
guilty of fraud, or misrepresentation in the selling of merchandise or
service to patrons.
(2) An applicant or a credential holder shall be subject to the
penalty provisions of this section if found guilty of any of the
following:
(a) Paying, directly or indirectly, any money or other thing of
value as a commission or gratuity for the securing of business;
(b) The buying of a business of any person, firm, or corporation, or
the paying of a commission to any person, firm, or corporation or to any
hospital or any institution where death occurs or to any hospital
superintendent, nurse, intern, or other employee, whether directly or
indirectly; or
(c) Willful malpractice.
(3) Any funeral director and embalmer who commits any of the acts or
things prohibited by this section or otherwise violates any of the
provisions thereof shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
licensed funeral director and embalmer from (a) engaging in sales of
funeral goods or services under the Burial Pre-Need Sale Act or (b)
allowing a nonlicensed funeral director and embalmer to officiate at a
funeral ceremony.
Sec. 2. Original section 38-1424, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-